North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§ 130A-309.06.
Additional powers and duties of the Department.

In addition to other powers and duties set forth in this Part, the Department shall:

Develop a comprehensive solid waste management plan consistent with this Part. The plan shall be developed in consultation with units of local government and shall be updated at least every three years. In developing the State solid waste management plan,
the Department shall hold public hearings around the State and shall give notice of these public hearings to all units of local government and regional planning agencies.

Provide guidance for the orderly collection, transportation, storage, separation, processing, recovery, recycling, and disposal of solid waste throughout the State.

Encourage coordinated local activity for solid waste management within a common geographical area.

Provide planning, technical, and financial assistance to units of local government and State agencies for reduction, recycling, reuse, and processing of solid waste and for safe and environmentally sound solid waste management and disposal.

Cooperate with appropriate federal agencies, local governments, and private organizations in carrying out the provisions of this Part.

Promote and assist the development of solid waste reduction, recycling, and resource recovery programs that preserve and enhance the quality of the air, water, and other natural resources of the State.

Maintain a directory of recycling and resource recovery systems in the State and provide assistance with matching recovered materials with markets.

Manage a program of grants for programs for recycling and special waste management, and for programs that provide for the safe and proper management of solid waste.

Provide for the education of the general public and the training of solid waste management professionals to reduce the production of solid waste, to ensure proper processing and disposal of solid waste, and to encourage recycling and solid waste reduction.

Develop descriptive literature to inform units of local government of their solid waste management responsibilities and opportunities.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 594, s. 10.

Provide and maintain recycling bins for the collection and recycling of newspaper, aluminum cans, glass containers, and recyclable plastic beverage containers at the North Carolina Zoological Park.

Identify, based on reports required under

G.S. 130A-309.14

and any other relevant information, those materials in the municipal solid waste stream that are marketable in the State or any portion thereof and that should be recovered from the waste stream prior to
treatment or disposal.

Identify and analyze, with assistance from the Department of Commerce pursuant to

G.S. 130A-309.14

, components of the State’s recycling industry and present and potential markets for recyclable materials in this State, other states, and foreign countries.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-550, s. 6(b), effective August 1, 2007, and applicable to any application for a permit for a solid waste management facility that is pending on that date.

The Department shall report to the Environmental Review Commission and the Fiscal Research Division on or before April 15 of each year on the status of solid waste management efforts in the State. The report shall include all of the following:

A comprehensive analysis, to be updated in each report, of solid waste generation and disposal in the State projected for the 20-year period beginning on July 1, 1991.

The total amounts of solid waste recycled and disposed of and the methods of solid waste recycling and disposal used during the calendar year prior to the year in which the report is published.

An evaluation of the development and implementation of local solid waste management programs and county and municipal recycling programs.

An evaluation of the success of each county or group of counties in meeting the municipal solid waste reduction goal established in

G.S. 130A-309.04

.

Recommendations concerning existing and potential programs for solid waste reduction and recycling that would be appropriate for units of local government and State agencies to implement to meet the requirements of this Part.

An evaluation of the recycling industry, the markets for recycled materials, the recycling of polystyrene, and the success of State, local, and private industry efforts to enhance the markets for these materials.

Recommendations to the Governor and the Environmental Review Commission to improve the management and recycling of solid waste in the State, including any proposed legislation to implement the recommendations.

A description of the condition of the Solid Waste Management Trust Fund and the use of all funds allocated from the Solid Waste Management Trust Fund, as required by G.S. 130A-309.12(c).

A description of the review and revision of bid procedures and the purchase and use of reusable, refillable, repairable, more durable, and less toxic supplies and products by both the Department of Administration and the Department of Transportation,
as required by G.S. 130A-309.14(a1)(3).

A description of the implementation of the North Carolina Scrap Tire Disposal Act that includes the amount of revenue used for grants and to clean up nuisance tire collection under the provisions of G.S 130A-309.64.

A description of the management of white goods in the State, as required by

G.S. 130A-309.85

.

A summary of the report by the Department of Transportation on the amounts and types of recycled materials that were specified or used in contracts that were entered into by the Department of Transportation during the previous fiscal year, as required
by G.S. 136-28.8(g).

Repealed by Session Laws 2010-142, s. 1, effective July 22, 2010.

(Expiring October 1, 2023) — A description of the activities related to the management of abandoned manufactured homes in the State in accordance with

G.S. 130A-117

, the beginning and ending balances in the Solid Waste Management Trust Fund for the reporting period and the amount of funds used, itemized by county, for grants made under Part 2F of Article 9 of Chapter
130A of the General Statutes.

A report on the recycling of discarded computer equipment and televisions in the State pursuant to

G.S. 130A-309.140(a)

.

An evaluation of the Brownfields Property Reuse Act pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.40

.

Reports on the Inactive Hazardous Waste Response Act of 1987 pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.10

.

A report on the Dry-Cleaning Solvent Cleanup Act of 1997 pursuant to

G.S. 143-215.104

U(a) until such time as the Act expires pursuant to Part 6 of Article 21A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

A report on the implementation and cost of the hazardous waste management program pursuant to G.S. 130A-294(i).

A report on the use of funds for Superfund cleanups and inactive hazardous site cleanups.

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-452, s. 3.1, effective October 28, 2001.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1991, c. 336, s. 4; c. 621, ss. 3, 4; 1993, c. 250, s. 3; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 10; 2001-452, s. 3.1; 2007-550, s. 6(b); 2008-136, s. 2; 2010-142, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 14.16(d); 2017-10, s.
4.14(a); 2020-74, s. 11(b); 2020-78, s. 7.2(b).

§ 130A-309.07.
State solid waste management plan.

The State solid waste management plan shall include, at a minimum:

Procedures to encourage cooperative efforts in solid waste management by counties and municipalities and groups of counties and municipalities where appropriate, including the establishment of joint agencies pursuant to

G.S. 160A-462

.

Provisions for the continuation of existing effective regional resource recovery, recycling, and solid waste management facilities and programs.

Planning guidance and technical assistance to counties and municipalities to aid in meeting the municipal solid waste reduction goals established in

G.S. 130A-309.04

.

Planning guidance and technical assistance to counties and municipalities to assist the development and implementation of solid waste reduction programs.

Technical assistance to counties and municipalities in determining the full cost for solid waste management as required in

G.S. 130A-309.08

.

Planning guidance and technical assistance to counties and municipalities to assist the development and implementation of programs for alternative disposal, processing, or recycling of the solid wastes prohibited from disposal in landfills pursuant to

G.S. 130A-309.10

and for special wastes.

A public education program, to be developed in cooperation with the Department of Public Instruction, units of local government, other State agencies, and business and industry organizations, to inform the public of the need for and the benefits of recycling
solid waste and reducing the amounts of solid and hazardous waste generated and disposed of in the State. The public education program shall be implemented through public workshops and through the use of brochures, reports, public
service announcements, and other materials.

Provisions to encourage partnerships between the public and private sectors that strengthen the supply of, and demand for, recyclable materials and that foster opportunities for economic development from the recovery and reuse of materials.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1991, c. 621, s. 5; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 11.

§ 130A-309.08.
Determination of cost for solid waste management; local solid waste management fees.

Each county and each municipality shall annually determine the full cost for solid waste management within the service area of the county or municipality for the preceding year. The Commission shall establish by rule the method for units of local government
to use in calculating full cost.

Each municipality shall establish a system to inform, no less than once a year, residential and nonresidential users of solid waste management services within the municipality’s service area of the user’s share, on an average or individual basis, of the
full cost for solid waste management as determined pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Counties shall provide the information required of municipalities only to residential and nonresidential users of solid waste management
services within the county’s service area that are not served by a municipality. Municipalities shall include costs charged to them or to persons contracting with them for disposal of solid waste in the full cost information provided
to residential and nonresidential users of solid waste management services. Counties and municipalities are encouraged to operate their solid waste management systems through use of an enterprise fund.

For purposes of this section, “service area” means the area in which the county or municipality provides, directly or by contract, solid waste management services. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to require a person operating under
a franchise contract or other agreement to collect or dispose of solid waste within the service area of a county or municipality to make the calculations or to establish a system to provide the information required under this section,
unless such person agrees to do so as part of such franchise contract or other agreement.

A county may charge fees for the collection, processing, or disposal of solid waste as provided in Article 15 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes. A city may charge fees for the collection, processing, or disposal of solid waste as provided in Article
16 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes.

, (f) Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 594, s. 12.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1991, c. 621, s. 6; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 12.

§ 130A-309.09.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 130A-309.09

A to 130A-309.09C by Session Laws 1991, c. 621, ss. 7 through 10.

§ 130A-309.09A.
Local government solid waste responsibilities.

The governing board of each unit of local government shall assess local solid waste collection services and disposal capacity and shall determine the adequacy of collection services and disposal capacity to meet local needs and to protect human health
and the environment. Each unit of local government shall implement programs and take other actions that it determines are necessary to address deficiencies in service or capacity required to meet local needs and to protect human
health and the environment. A unit of local government may adopt ordinances governing the disposal, in facilities that it operates, of solid waste generated outside of the area designated to be served by the facility. Such ordinances
shall not be construed to apply to privately operated disposal facilities located within the boundaries of the unit of local government.

Units of local government shall make a good-faith effort to achieve the State’s forty percent (40%) municipal solid waste reduction goal and to comply with the State’s comprehensive solid waste management plan.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 594, s. 12.

In order to assess the progress in meeting the goal set out in

G.S. 130A-309.04

, each unit of local government shall report to the Department on the solid waste management programs and waste reduction activities within the unit of local government by 1 September of each year. At a minimum,
the report shall include:

A description of public education programs on recycling.

The amount of solid waste received at municipal solid waste management facilities, by type of solid waste.

The amount and type of materials from the solid waste stream that were recycled.

The percentage of the population participating in various types of recycling activities instituted.

The annual reduction in municipal solid waste, measured as provided in

G.S. 130A-309.04

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-409, s. 1, effective August 23, 2013.

A statement of the costs of solid waste management programs implemented by the unit of local government and the methods of financing those costs.

Information regarding permanent recycling programs for discarded computer equipment and televisions for which funds are received pursuant to

G.S. 130A-309.137

, and information on operative interlocal agreements executed in conjunction with funds received, if any.

A description of the disaster debris management program.

A description of scrap tire disposal procedures.

A description of white goods management procedures.

Information regarding the prevention of illegal disposal and management of litter.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 594, s. 13.

Each operator of a municipal solid waste management facility shall weigh all solid waste when it is received.

A unit of local government that is a collector of municipal solid waste shall not knowingly collect for disposal, and the owner or operator of a municipal solid waste management facility that is owned or operated by a unit of local government shall not
knowingly dispose of, any type or form of municipal solid waste that is generated within the boundaries of a unit of local government that by ordinance:

Prohibits generators or collectors of municipal solid waste from disposing of that type or form of municipal solid waste.

Requires generators or collectors of municipal solid waste to recycle that type or form of municipal solid waste.

The storage, retention, and use of nonhazardous recyclable materials, including asphalt pavement, rap, or roofing shingles, shall be encouraged by units of local government. A unit of local government shall not impede the storage, retention, or use of
nonhazardous recyclable materials in properly zoned storage facilities through the regulation of the height or setback of recyclable material stockpiles, except when such facilities are located on lots within 200 yards of residential
districts.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1009, s. 4; 1991, c. 621, s. 7; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 13; 2007-550, s. 16.2; 2008-136, s. 3; 2008-198, s. 11.4; 2008-208, ss. 2, 7; 2009-484, s. 16(a), (b); 2009-550,
s. 10(a), (b); 2010-67, ss. 1(a)-(d), 3(a), (b); 2013-409, s. 1; 2013-413, s. 50; 2014-115, s. 17.

§ 130A-309.09B.
Local government waste reduction programs.

Each unit of local government shall establish and maintain a solid waste reduction program. The following requirements shall apply:

Demolition debris consisting of used asphalt or used asphalt mixed with dirt, sand, gravel, rock, concrete, or similar nonhazardous material may be used as fill and need not be disposed of in a permitted landfill or solid waste disposal facility, provided
that demolition debris may not be placed in the waters of the State or at or below the seasonal high water table.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 621, s. 8.

Units of local government are encouraged to separate marketable plastics, glass, metal, and all grades of paper for recycling prior to final disposal and are further encouraged to recycle yard trash and other organic solid waste into compost available
for agricultural and other acceptable uses.

To the maximum extent practicable, units of local government should participate in the preparation and implementation of joint waste reduction and solid waste management programs, whether through joint agencies established pursuant to

G.S. 153A-421

,

G.S. 160A-462

, or any other means provided by law. Nothing in a county’s solid waste management or waste reduction program shall affect the authority of a municipality to franchise or otherwise provide for the collection of solid
waste generated within the boundaries of the municipality.

through (e) Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 594, s. 14.

(f) A county or counties and its or their municipalities may jointly determine, through a joint agency established pursuant to

G.S. 153A-421

or

G.S. 160A-462

, which local governmental agency shall administer a solid waste management or waste reduction program.

(g) Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 594, s. 14.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1009, s. 4; 1991, c. 537, s. 2; c. 621, s. 8; 1993, c. 86, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 14; 2013-409, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-409, s. 2, effective August 23, 2013, deleted “that will enable the unit of local government to meet the local solid waste reduction goals established pursuant to

G.S. 130A-309.09

A(b)(2)” at the end of the first sentence in subsection (a).

§ 130A-309.09C.
Additional powers of local governments; construction of this Part; effect of noncompliance.

To effect the purposes of this Part, counties and municipalities are authorized, in addition to other powers granted pursuant to this Part:

To contract with persons to provide resource recovery services or operate resource recovery facilities on behalf of the county or municipality.

To indemnify persons providing resource recovery services or operating resource recovery facilities for liabilities or claims arising out of the provision or operation of such services or facilities that are not the result of the sole negligence of the
persons providing the services or operating the facilities.

To contract with persons to provide solid waste disposal services or operate solid waste disposal facilities on behalf of the county or municipality.

A county or municipality may enter into a written agreement with other persons, including persons transporting solid waste, to undertake to fulfill some or all of the county’s or municipality’s responsibilities under this Part.

Nothing in this Part shall be construed to prevent the governing board of any county or municipality from providing by ordinance or regulation for solid waste management standards which are stricter or more extensive than those imposed by the State solid
waste management program and rules and orders issued to implement the State program.

Nothing in this Part or in any rule adopted by any agency shall be construed to require any county or municipality to participate in any regional solid waste management until the governing board of the county or municipality has determined that participation
in such a program is economically feasible for that county or municipality. Nothing in this Part or in any special or local act or in any rule adopted by any agency shall be construed to limit the authority of a municipality to
regulate the disposal of solid waste located within its boundaries or generated within its boundaries so long as a facility for any such disposal has been approved by the Department, unless the municipality is included within a
solid waste management program created under a joint agency or special or local act. If bonds had been issued to finance a solid waste management program in reliance on State law granting to a unit of local government, a region,
or a special district the responsibility for the solid waste management program, nothing herein shall permit any governmental agency to withdraw from the program if the agency’s participation is necessary for the financial feasibility
of the project, so long as the bonds are outstanding.

Nothing in this Part or in any rule adopted by any State agency pursuant to this Part shall require any person to subscribe to any private solid waste collection service.

In the event a region, special district, or other entity by special act or joint agency, has been established to manage solid waste, any duty or responsibility or penalty imposed under this Part on a unit of local government shall apply to such region,
special district, or other entity to the extent of the grant of the duty or responsibility or imposition of such penalty. To the same extent, such region, special district, or other entity shall be eligible for grants or other
benefits provided pursuant to this Part.

In addition to any other penalties provided by law, a unit of local government that does not comply with the requirements of

G.S. 130A-309.09

A(b),

G.S. 130A-309.09

A(d), and G.S. 130A-309.09B(a) shall not be eligible for grants from the Solid Waste Management Trust Fund or the White Goods Management Account and shall not receive the proceeds of the scrap tire disposal tax imposed
by Article 5B of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes or the proceeds of the white goods disposal tax imposed by Article 5C of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes to which the unit of local government would otherwise be entitled.
The Secretary shall notify the Secretary of Revenue to withhold payment of these funds to any unit of local government that fails to comply with the requirements of G.S. 130A-309.09A(b), G.S. 130A-309.09A(d), and G.S. 130A-309.09B(a).
Proceeds of the scrap tire disposal tax that are withheld pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to the General Fund and may be used as provided in

G.S. 130A-309.64

. Proceeds of the white goods disposal tax that are withheld pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to the General Fund and may be used as provided in

G.S. 130A-309.83

.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1009, s. 4; 1991, c. 621, s. 9; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 15; 2013-360, ss. 14.16(e), 14.17(d); 2013-409, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.16(e), effective July 1, 2013, in subsection (g), deleted “the Scrap Tire Disposal Account” preceding “or the White Goods” in the first sentence, and, in the third sentence, substituted “General Fund” for “Scrap Tire Disposal
Account” and “G.S. 130A-309.64” for “G.S. 130A-309.63.”

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.17(d), effective August 1, 2013, substituted “General Fund” for “White Goods Management Account” in the last sentence of subsection (g).

Session Laws 2013-409, s. 3, effective August 23, 2013, inserted “G.S. 130A-309.09A(d)” twice in subsection (g).

§ 130A-309.09D.
Responsibilities of generators of municipal solid waste owners and operators of privately owned solid waste management facilities and collectors of municipal solid waste.

A generator of municipal solid waste shall not knowingly dispose of, a collector of municipal solid waste shall not knowingly collect for disposal, and the owner or operator of a privately owned or operated municipal solid waste management facility shall
not knowingly dispose of, any type or form of municipal solid waste that is generated within the boundaries of a unit of local government that by ordinance:

Prohibits generators or collectors of municipal solid waste from disposing of that type or form of municipal solid waste.

Requires generators or collectors of municipal solid waste to recycle that type or form of municipal solid waste.

On or before 1 August, the owner or operator of a privately owned solid waste management facility shall report to the Department, for the previous year beginning 1 July and ending 30 June, the amount by weight of the solid waste that was received at the
facility and disposed of in a landfill, incinerated, or converted to fuel. To the maximum extent practicable, the reports shall indicate by weight the county of origin of all solid waste. The owner or operator shall transmit a
copy of the report to the county in which the facility is located and to each county from which solid waste originated.

A generator of industrial solid waste that owns and operates an industrial solid waste facility for the management of industrial solid waste generated by that generator shall develop a 10-year waste management plan. The plan shall be updated at least
every three years. In order to assure compliance with this subsection, each generator to which this subsection applies shall provide the Department with a copy of its current plan upon request by the Department. Each generator
to which this subsection applies shall file a report on its implementation of the plan required by this subsection with the Department by 1 August of each year. A generator to which this subsection applies may provide the Department
with a copy of a current plan prepared pursuant to an ordinance adopted by a unit of local government or prepared for any other purpose if the plan meets the requirements of this subsection. The plan shall have the following components:

A waste reduction goal established by the generator.

Options for the management and reduction of wastes evaluated by the generator.

A waste management strategy, including plans for waste reduction and waste disposal, for the 10-year period covered by the plan.

History.
1991, c. 621, s. 11; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 16.

§ 130A-309.10.
Prohibited acts relating to packaging; coded labeling of plastic containers required; disposal of certain solid wastes in landfills or by incineration prohibited.

No beverage shall be sold or offered for sale within the State in a beverage container designed and constructed so that the container is opened by detaching a metal ring or tab.

No person shall distribute, sell, or offer for sale in this State, any product packaged in a container or packing material manufactured with fully halogenated chlorofluorocarbons (CFC). Producers of containers or packing material manufactured with chlorofluorocarbons
(CFC) are urged to introduce alternative packaging materials that are environmentally compatible.

No plastic bag shall be provided at any retail outlet to any retail customer to use for the purpose of carrying items purchased by that customer unless the bag is composed of material that is recyclable.

It is the goal of the State that at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the plastic bags provided at retail outlets in the State to retail customers for carrying items purchased by the customer be recycled.

No person shall distribute, sell, or offer for sale in this State any polystyrene foam product that is to be used in conjunction with food for human consumption unless the product is composed of material that is recyclable.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 321, s. 1.

No person shall distribute, sell, or offer for sale in this State any rigid plastic container, including a plastic beverage container, unless the container has a molded label indicating the plastic resin used to produce the container. The code shall consist
of a number placed within three triangulated arrows and letters placed below the triangulated arrows. The three arrows shall form an equilateral triangle with the common point of each line forming each angle of the triangle at
the midpoint of each arrow and rounded with a short radius. The arrowhead of each arrow shall be at the midpoint of each side of the triangle with a short gap separating the arrowhead from the base of the adjacent arrow. The triangle
formed by the three arrows curved at their midpoints shall depict a clockwise path around the code number. The label shall appear on or near the bottom of the container and be clearly visible. A container having a capacity of less
than eight fluid ounces or more than five gallons is exempt from the requirements of this subsection. The numbers and letters shall be as follows:

For polyethylene terephthalate, the letters “PETE” and the number 1.

For high density polyethylene, the letters “HDPE” and the number 2.

For vinyl, the letter “V” and the number 3.

For low density polyethylene, the letters “LDPE” and the number 4.

For polypropylene, the letters “PP” and the number 5.

For polystyrene, the letters “PS” and the number 6.

For any other, the letters “OTHER” and the number 7.

(e1)

(See Editor’s note for applicability)
No person shall distribute, sell, or offer for sale in this State any rigid plastic container, including a plastic beverage container labeled “degradable,” “biodegradable,” “compostable,” or other words
suggesting the container will biodegrade unless (i) the container complies with the requirements of subsection (e) of this section and (ii) t he container includes a label with the statement “Not Recyclable, Do Not
Recycle” in print of the same color, contrast, font, and size as the language suggesting the container will biodegrade.

No person shall knowingly dispose of the following solid wastes in landfills:

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 375, s. 1.

Used oil.

Yard trash, except in landfills approved for the disposal of yard trash under rules adopted by the Commission. Yard trash that is source separated from solid waste may be accepted at a solid waste disposal area where the area provides and maintains separate
yard trash composting facilities.

White goods.

Antifreeze (ethylene glycol).

Aluminum cans.

Whole scrap tires, as provided in G.S. 130A-309.58(b). The prohibition on disposal of whole scrap tires in landfills applies to all whole pneumatic rubber coverings, but does not apply to whole solid rubber coverings.

Lead-acid batteries, as provided in

G.S. 130A-309.70

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-394, s. 4, effective July 1, 2011.

Motor vehicle oil filters.

Recyclable rigid plastic containers that are required to be labeled as provided in subsection (e) of this section, that have a neck smaller than the body of the container, and that accept a screw top, snap cap, or other closure. The prohibition on disposal
of recyclable rigid plastic containers in landfills does not apply to rigid plastic containers that are intended for use in the sale or distribution of motor oil or pesticides.

Wooden pallets, except that wooden pallets may be disposed of in a landfill that is permitted to only accept construction and demolition debris.

Oyster shells.

Discarded computer equipment, as defined in

G.S. 130A-309.131

.

Discarded televisions, as defined in

G.S. 130A-309.131

.

(f1) No person shall knowingly dispose of the following solid wastes by incineration in an incinerator for which a permit is required under this Article:

(1) Antifreeze (ethylene glycol) used solely in motor vehicles.

(2) Aluminum cans.

(3) Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 594, s. 17.

(4) White goods.

(5) Lead-acid batteries, as provided in

G.S. 130A-309.70

.

(6) Repealed by Session Laws 2011-394, s. 4, effective July 1, 2011.

(7) Discarded computer equipment, as defined in G.S. 130A-309.131.

(8) Discarded televisions, as defined in G.S. 130A-309.131.

(f2) Subsections (f1) and (f3) of this section shall not apply to solid waste incinerated in an incinerator solely owned and operated by the generator of the solid waste. Subsection (f1) of this section shall not apply to antifreeze (ethylene glycol)
that cannot be recycled or reclaimed to make it usable as antifreeze in a motor vehicle.

(f3) Holders of on-premises malt beverage permits, on-premises unfortified wine permits, on-premises fortified wine permits, and mixed beverages permits shall not knowingly dispose of beverage containers that are required to be recycled under

G.S. 18B-1006.1

in landfills or by incineration in an incinerator for which a permit is required under this Article.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 594, s. 17.

The accidental or occasional disposal of small amounts of prohibited solid waste by landfill shall not be construed as a violation of subsection (f) or (f3) of this section.

The accidental or occasional disposal of small amounts of prohibited solid waste by incineration shall not be construed as a violation of subsection (f1) or (f3) of this section if the Department has approved a plan for the incinerator as provided in
subsection (j) of this section or if the incinerator is exempt from subsection (j) of this section.

The Department may issue a permit pursuant to this Article for an incinerator that is subject to subsection (f1) of this section only if the applicant for the permit has a plan approved by the Department pursuant to this subsection. The applicant shall
file the plan at the time of the application for the permit. The Department shall approve a plan only if it complies with the requirements of this subsection. The plan shall provide for the implementation of a program to prevent
the incineration of the solid waste listed in subsections (f1) and (f3) of this section. The program shall include the random visual inspection prior to incineration of at least ten percent (10%) of the solid waste to be incinerated.
The program shall also provide for the retention of the records of the random visual inspections and the training of personnel to recognize the solid waste listed in subsections (f1) and (f3) of this section. If a random visual
inspection discovers solid waste that may not be incinerated pursuant to subsections (f1) and (f3) of this section, the program shall provide that the operator of the incinerator shall dispose of the solid waste in accordance with
applicable federal and State laws, regulations, and rules. This subsection does not apply to an incinerator that disposes only of medical waste.

A county or city may petition the Department for a waiver from the prohibition on disposal of a material described in subdivisions (9), (10), (11), (12), and (13) of subsection (f) of this section and subsection (f3) of this section in a landfill based
on a showing that prohibiting the disposal of the material would constitute an economic hardship.

Oyster shells that are delivered to a landfill shall be stored at the landfill for at least 90 days or until they are removed for recycling. If oyster shells that are stored at a landfill are not removed for recycling within 90 days of delivery to the
landfill, then, notwithstanding subdivision (13) of subsection (f) of this section, the oyster shells may be disposed of in the landfill.

No person shall knowingly dispose of fluorescent lights and thermostats that contain mercury in a sanitary landfill for the disposal of construction and demolition debris waste that is unlined or in any other landfill that is unlined.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1991, c. 23, s. 1; c. 375, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 932, ss. 1, 2; 1993, c. 290, s. 1; 1995, c. 321, s. 1; c. 504, s. 9; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 17; 2001-440, ss. 3.1, 3.2; 2005-348,
s. 3; 2005-362, ss. 2, 3; 2006-226, s. 24(a); 2006-264, ss. 98.5(a), (c); 2007-550, ss. 16.3, 16.4; 2008-198, s. 11.4; 2008-208, ss. 3, 4, 7; 2009-499, s. 1; 2009-484, s. 16(a), (b); 2009-550, s. 10(a), (b); 2010-67, ss. 1(a)-(d),
4(a), (b); 2010-142, s. 10; 2010-180, s. 14(b); 2011-394, s. 4; 2012-194, s. 28; 2012-201, s. 3; 2013-74, s. 1.

§ 130A-309.11.
Compost standards and applications.

In order to protect the State’s land and water resources, compost produced, utilized, or disposed of by the composting process at solid waste management facilities in the State must meet criteria established by the Department.

The Commission shall adopt rules to establish standards for the production of compost. Rules shall be adopted not later than 24 months after the initiation of rule making. Such rules shall include:

Requirements necessary to produce hygienically safe compost products for varying applications.

A classification scheme for compost based on:

The types of waste composted, including at least one type containing only yard trash;

The maturity of the compost, including at least three degrees of decomposition for fresh, semi-mature, and mature; and

The levels of organic and inorganic constituents in the compost.

The compost classification scheme shall address:

Methods for measurement of the compost maturity.

Particle sizes.

Moisture content.

Average levels of organic and inorganic constituents, including heavy metals, for such classes of compost as the Department establishes, and the analytical methods to determine those levels.

The Commission shall adopt rules to prescribe the allowable uses and application rates of compost. Rules shall be adopted not later than 24 months after the initiation of rule making. Such rules shall be based on the following criteria:

The total quantity of organic and inorganic constituents, including heavy metals, allowed to be applied through the addition of compost to the soil per acre per year.

The allowable uses of compost based on maturity and type of compost.

If compost is produced which does not meet the criteria prescribed by the Department for agricultural and other use, the compost must be reprocessed or disposed of in a manner approved by the Department, unless a different application is specifically
permitted by the Department.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 18.

§ 130A-309.12.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.18(b), effective July 1, 2013.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1991, c. 690, s. 10; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 990, s. 7; 1993, c. 471, ss. 5, 8; c. 513, s. 1; c. 548, s. 3; 1997-209, s. 1; 1998-24, ss. 3, 7; 2000-109, s. 9(a); 2001-265, s. 5; 2001-452, s. 3.2;
2009-451, s. 13.3A; 2010-31, s. 13.1(c); 2010-142, s. 11; repealed by 2013-360, s. 14.18(b), effective July 1, 2013.